Washington statutes.
RCW 31.24.220

Confidentiality and disclosure—Examinations.

The existing privileges, immunities, and requirements of confidentiality and disclosure with respect to examination records and information obtained by the director in conducting examinations, which are applicable to banks, as set forth in *RCW 30.04.075, apply to examination records and information obtained by the director in conducting examinations of business development companies organized under this chapter.

[ 2006 c 87 s 25.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 30.04.075 was recodified as RCW 30A.04.075 pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.